Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2430.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 1B.3, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 1B.3 Flags on public buildings. 1. As used in this section, âpublic buildingâ means a vertical improvement, as defined in section 15J.2, used for a public purpose by the state or a political subdivision of the state. 2. It shall be the duty of any A board of public officers charged with providing supplies for a public building in the state to shall provide a suitable state flag , and it shall be the duty of the custodian of that public building to shall raise the flags of the United States of America and the state of Iowa , upon each secular day when weather conditions are favorable. 3. The custodian and the board of public officers of a public building in the state shall have the flags of the United States of America and the state of Iowa flown at half-staff when so directed by a proclamation issued by the governor. 4. A person may report an alleged violation of subsection 3 to the attorney general. The attorney general may initiate an action in the name of the state, including but not limited Senate File 2430, p. 2 to an action for injunctive relief, to obtain compliance with subsection 3. ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House I hereby certify that this bill originated in the Senate and is known as Senate File 2430, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ W. CHARLES SMITHSON Secretary of the Senate Approved _______________, 2026 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor